Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, HB2495.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Title 13, chapter 7, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended by adding section 13-722, to read: START_STATUTE13-722. Special sentencing provisions; offenses committed against vulnerable adult A person who is at least eighteen years of age or who has been tried as an adult, who is convicted of any felony OFFENSE under CHAPTER 11, 12, 13, 14, 15, 16, 17, 18, 19, 20, 21, 23 OR 36 OF THIS TITLE AND who knows or has reason to know that the victim of the offense is a vulnerable adult as defined in section 13-3623 shall not be eligible for suspension of sentence, probation, pardon or release from confinement on any basis except as authorized by section 31-233, subsection A or B until the sentence imposed by the court has been served, the person is eligible for release pursuant to section 41-1604.07 or the sentence is commuted. The presumptive, minimum and maximum sentence for the offense shall be increased by three years if the offense is a class 4, 5 or 6 felony or shall be increased by five years if the offense is a class 2 or 3 felony.  The additional sentence imposed pursuant to this section is in addition to any enhanced sentence that may be applicable. END_STATUTE